Mississippi statutes. Title 45. Public Safety and Good Order
Chapter 33. Registration of Sex Offenders
§ 45-33-59.
Sex offenders employed in positions with direct, private and unsupervised contact with minors under the age of 18 required to notify employers in writing of sex offender status; notification to parents or guardians; applicability of section.

Any person convicted of a sex offense who is employed in any position, or who contracts with a person to provide personal services, where the employee or contractor will have direct, private and unsupervised contact with minors under the age of eighteen (18) shall notify in writing the employer or the person with whom the person has contracted or is employed of his sex offender status.

The employer shall make a reasonable attempt to notify the parents or guardians of any minors under the age of eighteen (18) with whom the employee or contractor will have direct, private and unsupervised contact of the offender’s criminal record.

This section applies to all registered sex offenders regardless of the date of conviction.

An employer acting in good faith in making notification to parents or guardians under this section, or who fails in good faith to make notification, shall not be liable in any civil or criminal action as a result of the notification or failure to notify.

This section does not authorize the employment of a person for a position for which employment of a sex offender is prohibited by any law.

This section does not apply to an employer whose employees have only incidental contact with children because children may be present in the workplace without any formal agreement; casual or incidental contact does not trigger the duty to inform.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 566, § 7; Laws, 2007, ch. 392, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 2007; Laws, 2019, ch. 405, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 45-33-61.
Access to Administrative Office of Courts’ youth court data management system
by sex offenders prohibited.

A person convicted of a sex offense shall not access the Administrative Office of Courts’ youth court data management system known as the Mississippi Youth Court Information Delivery System or “MYCIDS.”

This section applies to all registered sex offenders without regard to the date of conviction for a registrable offense.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2012, ch. 410, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2012.).